lexc/verb/enhuiger.lexc
!!!enhuige.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Verb[gcat] +Rep +Imper +Pot
                   +Inf +Inf11 +Inf12 +Inf13 +Inf21 +Inf22 +Inf23 +Pref+  +Adv +Advan
                  +IndefSg1   +IndefSg2   +IndefSg3   +IndefSg12
                  +IndefPl1 +IndefPl2 +IndefPl3
                  +DefSg1   +DefSg2   +DefSg3  
                  +DefPl1 +DefPl2 +DefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg12 +PastDefSg12  +CondDefSg12
                  +ConjIndefSg1   +ConjIndefSg2   +ConjIndefSg3   
                  +ConjIndefPl1 +ConjIndefPl2 +ConjIndefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg1   +ConjDefSg2[lfea]   +ConjDefSg3  
                  +ConjDefPl1 +ConjDefPl2 +ConjDefPl3
                  +PastIndefSg1   +PastIndefSg2   +PastIndefSg3   
                  +PastIndefPl1 +PastIndefPl2 +PastIndefPl3
                  +PastDefSg1   +PastDefSg2   +PastDefSg3  
                  +PastDefPl1 +PastDefPl2 +PastDefPl3
                  +CondIndefSg1   +CondIndefSg2   +CondIndefSg3   
                  +CondIndefPl1 +CondIndefPl2 +CondIndefPl3
                  +CondDefSg1   +CondDefSg2   +CondDefSg3  
                  +CondDefPl1 +CondDefPl2 +CondDefPl3
        
§j§  §tatt§  
§sj§  
§AAmely§ §AAAmely§ §igeamely§ §igeomely§ §igeo2mely§ §igeumely§ 
§igejakik1mely§ §igejatokitek1mely§ §igeija1mely§ §igeaamely§ §igetattetmely§ §igeuomely§
§felteomely§ §szorelolmely§ §l§ §igeoomely§

LEXICON Root
Verb;
Prefigekoto;
Verb1;

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Verb;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Verb;
+Pref+:széjjel   Verb;
+Pref+:szembe   Verb;
+Pref+:szerte   Verb;
+Pref+:vissza   Verb;
+Pref+:helyre   Verb;
+Pref+:tovább   Verb;
+Pref+:tönkre   Verb;
+Pref+:észre   Verb;
+Pref+:rajta   Verb;
+Pref+:előre   Verb;
+Pref+:félbe   Verb;
+Pref+:félre   Verb;
+Pref+:felül   Verb;
+Pref+:fölül   Verb;
+Pref+:agyon   Verb;
+Pref+:ellen   Verb;
+Pref+:körbe   Verb;
+Pref+:körül   Verb;
+Pref+:közbe   Verb;
+Pref+:közre   Verb;
+Pref+:külön   Verb;
+Pref+:utána   Verb;
+Pref+:végbe   Verb;
+Pref+:végig   Verb;
+Pref+:hátra   Verb;
+Pref+:hozzá   Verb;
+Pref+:egybe   Verb;
+Pref+:ketté   Verb;
+Pref+:össze   Verb;
+Pref+:mellé   Verb;
+Pref+:által   Verb;
+Pref+:alul   Verb;
+Pref+:haza   Verb;
+Pref+:újra   Verb;
+Pref+:abba   Verb;
+Pref+:neki   Verb;
+Pref+:bele   Verb;
+Pref+:újjá   Verb;
+Pref+:benn   Verb;
+Pref+:fenn   Verb;
+Pref+:fönn   Verb;
+Pref+:jóvá   Verb;
+Pref+:szét   Verb;
+Pref+:tele   Verb;
+Pref+:tova   Verb;
+Pref+:meg   Verb;
+Pref+:oda   Verb;
+Pref+:elő   Verb;
+Pref+:túl   Verb;
+Pref+:alá   Verb;
+Pref+:föl   Verb;
+Pref+:ide   Verb;
+Pref+:fel   Verb;
+Pref+:rá   Verb;
+Pref+:ki   Verb;
+Pref+:le   Verb;
+Pref+:el   Verb;
+Pref+:át   Verb;
+Pref+:be   Verb;

LEXICON Verb
fú AddVerbmely;
fú:fúv AddVerb3mely;
hí AddVerbmely;
hí:hív AddVerb3mely;
rí AddVerbmely;
rí:rív AddVerb3mely;
ró AddVerbmely;
ró:rov AddVerb5mely;
szí AddVerbmely;
szí:szív AddVerb3mely;
sír-rí AddVerbmely;
sír-rí:sír-rív AddVerb3mely;

LEXICON Verb1
teleró AddVerbmely;
teleró:telerov AddVerb5mely;
teliró AddVerbmely;
teliró:telirov AddVerb5mely;


!ír
!írhat  potential
!irathat imper potential
!irat imper
!irattattat imper imper
!irjon command
!írhasson
!írogattathat rep imper pot
!íratgathat
!írogattatgat
!Irni
!írnék, írnál .. írnának cond conditional
! írjak írjon írj  command

!rí
LEXICON AddVerbmely
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Potmely;

LEXICON Potmely
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAAmely§t  Casemely;
             Case1mely;

LEXICON Casemely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeomely§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelolmely§         #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeumely§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igeamely§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeomely§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeomely§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1mely§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeumely§k       #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1mely§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1mely§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igeamely§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaamely§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeomely§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeumely§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igeamely§t§igeomely§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igeamely§n§igeamely§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeamely§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igeamely§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igeamely§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeumely§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaamely§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AAmely§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaamely§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattetmely§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeumely§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igeamely§t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igeamely§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igeamely§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igeamely§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igeamely§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeumely§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaamely§t§igeo2mely§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaamely§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^n§igeaamely§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^n§igeamely§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaamely§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoomely§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaamely§n§igeamely§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaamely§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^n§igeaamely§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^n§igeaamely§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaamely§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaamely§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igeamely§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igeamely§l§igeamely§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igeamely§l§igeamely§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaamely§l§igeamely§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON Case1mely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelolmely§         #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igeamely§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1mely§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeumely§k       #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^j§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^j§igeaamely§k     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igeamely§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaamely§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeomely§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeumely§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igeamely§t§igeomely§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igeamely§n§igeamely§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeamely§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igeamely§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^dd              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igeamely§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeumely§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaamely§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^tt§AAmely§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^tt§igeaamely§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^tt      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^tt§igeumely§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^tt§igeamely§t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^tt§igeamely§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^tt§igeamely§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^tt§igeamely§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^tt§igeamely§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^tt§igeumely§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^tt§igeaamely§t§igeo2mely§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^tt§igeaamely§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^n§igeaamely§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^n§igeamely§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaamely§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoomely§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaamely§n§igeamely§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaamely§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^n§igeaamely§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^n§igeaamely§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaamely§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaamely§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igeamely§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igeamely§l§igeamely§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^tt§igeamely§l§igeamely§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaamely§l§igeamely§k                  #;    ! ná/né

!rív
LEXICON AddVerb3mely
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Rep3mely;

LEXICON Rep3mely
!+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
!+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
!+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
!+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
!+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
!+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
!+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteomely§g§AAmely§t  Imper3mely;
                    Imper3mely1;

LEXICON Imper3mely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Nrep3mely;
                      Nrep5mely;
LEXICON Imper3mely1
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AAmely§t  Nrep3mely;
                      Nrep3mely1;
